Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB249.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 202C.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(2) "Commitment hearing" means the hearing under KRS 202C.040 to determine if a
respondent meets the criteria for involuntary commitment under this chapter;
(3) "Danger" means substantial physical harm or threat of substantial physical harm
upon self or others;
(4) "Evidentiary hearing" means the hearing under KRS 202C.030 to determine if the
defendant committed the qualifying offense for which he or she was charged by a
preponderance of the evidence;
(5) "Forensic psychiatric facility" means a mental institution or facility, or part thereof,
designated by the secretary for the purpose and function of providing inpatient
evaluation, care, and treatment for mentally ill persons or individuals with an
intellectual disability who have been charged with or convicted of a felony;
(6) "Hospital" means:
(a) A state mental hospital or institution or other licensed public or private
hospital, institution, health-care facility, or part thereof, approved by the
cabinet[Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services] as equipped to
provide full-time residential care and treatment for mentally ill persons or
individuals with an intellectual disability; or
(b) A hospital, institution, or health-care facility of the government of the United
States equipped to provide residential care and treatment for mentally ill
persons or individuals with an intellectual disability;
(7) "Individual with an intellectual disability" means a person with significantly
subaverage general intellectual functioning existing concurrently with deficits in
Page 1 of 5
HB024910.100 - 1047 - XXXX 2/23/2026 4:38 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 249/GA
adaptive behavior and manifested during the developmental period;
(8) "Judge" means the judge who found the respondent incompetent to stand trial in the
criminal proceeding from which the petition for involuntary commitment arose;
(9) "Less restrictive alternative mode of treatment" means a treatment given outside of
a forensic psychiatric facility which would provide a respondent with appropriate
treatment or care consistent with accepted professional practice standards and
protect the respondent's safety and the safety of others;
(10) "Mentally ill person" means a person with substantially impaired capacity to use
self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of the person's affairs and social
relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized emotional symptoms
where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or emotional symptoms can be
related to physiological, psychological, or social factors;
(11) "Qualified mental health professional" means:
(a) A physician licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the performance of official duties;
(b) A psychiatrist licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the practice of official duties, who is certified or eligible to apply
for certification by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
(c) A psychologist with the health service provider designation, a psychological
practitioner, a certified psychologist, or a psychological associate, licensed
under [the provisions of ]KRS Chapter 319;
(d) A licensed registered nurse with:
1. A master's degree in psychiatric nursing from an accredited institution
and two (2) years of clinical experience with mentally ill persons;[,] or
2. [a licensed registered nurse, with ]A bachelor's degree in nursing from
Page 2 of 5
HB024910.100 - 1047 - XXXX 2/23/2026 4:38 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 249/GA
an accredited institution, who:
a. Is certified as a psychiatric and mental health nurse by the
American Nurses Association;[ and who]
b. Has three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric nursing; and
c. Is currently employed by:
i. A hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the
Commonwealth;[ or]
ii. A psychiatric unit of a general hospital;[ or]
iii. A private agency or company engaged in the provision of
mental health services; or
iv. A regional community program for mental health and
individuals with an intellectual disability;
(e) A licensed clinical social worker licensed under [the provisions of ]KRS
335.100, or a certified social worker licensed under [the provisions of ]KRS
335.080 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric social work and currently employed by a hospital or forensic
psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a
general hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision of
mental health services or a regional community program for mental health and
individuals with an intellectual disability;
(f) A marriage and family therapist licensed under [the provisions of ]KRS
335.300 to 335.399 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical
experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a
hospital or forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit
of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing
mental health services, or a regional community program for mental health
Page 3 of 5
HB024910.100 - 1047 - XXXX 2/23/2026 4:38 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 249/GA
and individuals with an intellectual disability;
(g) A professional counselor credentialed under [the provisions of ]KRS Chapter
335.500 to 335.599 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical
experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a
hospital or forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit
of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing
mental health services, or a regional community program for mental health
and individuals with an intellectual disability; or
(h) A physician assistant licensed under KRS 311.840 to 311.862, who meets one
(1) of the following requirements:
1. Provides documentation that he or she has completed a psychiatric
residency program for physician assistants;
2. Has completed at least one thousand (1,000) hours of clinical experience
under a supervising physician, as defined by KRS 311.840, who is a
psychiatrist and is certified or eligible for certification by the American
Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
3. Holds a master's degree from a physician assistant program accredited
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant or its predecessor or successor agencies, is
practicing under a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840,
and:
a. Has two (2) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
Page 4 of 5
HB024910.100 - 1047 - XXXX 2/23/2026 4:38 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 249/GA
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least two (2) years; or
4. Holds a bachelor's degree, possesses a current physician assistant
certificate issued by the board prior to July 15, 2002, is practicing under
a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840, and:
a. Has three (3) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least three (3) years;
(12) "Qualifying offense" means a capital offense, a Class A felony, a Class B felony
resulting in death or serious physical injury, or a felony offense under KRS
Chapter 510[violation of KRS 510.040 or 510.070];
(13) "Respondent" means a person who was a criminal defendant found incompetent to
stand trial who is or was the subject of a petition for involuntary commitment filed
under KRS Chapter 504;
(14) "Review hearing" means any hearing conducted to determine if a respondent
continues to meet the criteria for involuntary commitment after the initial order for
involuntary commitment has been issued under this chapter; and
(15) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
Page 5 of 5
HB024910.100 - 1047 - XXXX 2/23/2026 4:38 PM GA